Utah statutes.
17-18a-302.   Qualifications.

(1)  A person filing a declaration of candidacy for the office of county or district attorney shall be:

(a)  a United States citizen;

(b)  an attorney licensed to practice law in the state;

(c)  an active member of the Utah State Bar in good standing;

(d)  except as provided in Subsection (2), a registered voter in the county or prosecution district in which the attorney is elected to office; and

(e)  except as provided in Subsection (2), as of the date of election, a resident for at least one year of the county or prosecution district in which the person seeks office.

(2)  A person appointed to the office of county or district attorney in accordance with Section 20A-1-509.2 shall be:

(a)  a United States citizen;

(b)  an attorney licensed to practice law in the state; and

(c)  an active member of the Utah State Bar in good standing.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

